Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2050.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 493.2, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 493.2. A. Foreign Unless otherwise provided by this
section, foreign applicants and international medical school
graduate applicants shall otherwise meet all requirements for full
and unrestricted licensure as provided in Sections 492.1 and 493.1
of this title.
B. 1. A foreign applicant for full and unrestricted licensure
shall possess the degree of Doctor of Medicine or a Board-approved
equivalent based on satisfactory completion of educational programs
from a foreign medical school as evidenced by recognized national

and international resources available to the Board the Educational
Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG).
2. In the event the foreign medical school utilized clerkships
in the United States, its territories or possessions, such
clerkships shall have been performed in hospitals and schools that
have programs accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate
Medical Education (ACGME).
C. A 1. An international medical school graduate may apply for
limited licensure. The Board may issue a limited license of defined
duration to an international medical school graduate upon finding
sufficient evidence that the international medical school graduate
has:
a. graduated from a medical school which meets the
requirements of the Educational Commission for Foreign
Medical Graduates (ECFMG), and
b. paid any application fee as set by the Board.
2. The Board shall also find sufficient evidence of the
competency of the international medical school graduate through the
following:
a. verification of successful completion of a three-year
postgraduate training program in the graduate's
licensing country, or
b. verification that the applicant otherwise practiced as
a medical professional performing the duties of a
physician for at least three (3) of the last five (5)
years outside the United States verified by the
employer or health care provider.
3. An applicant under subparagraphs a and b of paragraph 1 of
this subsection shall submit sufficient evidence that the applicant
is an international medical school graduate and has an offer for
employment as a physician at a health care provider that operates in
this state and has a postgraduate training program accredited by the
Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME) in
place.
4. During the term of the limited license, an international
medical school graduate who is granted a limited license under
ENR. H. B. NO. 2050 Page 2

subparagraphs a and b of paragraph 1 of this subsection shall only
provide medical services at a health care provider that has in place
postgraduate training program accredited by the Accreditation
Council for Graduate Medical Education (ACGME).
5. An international medical school graduate who is granted a
limited license shall be supervised by the chair of the department
within the applicant's intended practice during the term of the
limited license.
6. Three (3) years after the first date the limited licensee
begins to practice medicine at a health care provider in this state,
the Board may grant a full and unrestricted license to practice
medicine to a limited licensee under subparagraphs a and b of
paragraph 1 of this subsection who:
a. is in good standing without disciplinary actions or
investigations pending from his or her limited
licensure period, and
b. provides documentation of a passing score for United
States Medical Licensing Examination (USMLE) Step 1, 2
CK, and 3.
7. A limited licensee who obtains a full and unrestricted
license is not thereafter subject to the restriction of practicing
at a health care provider with a postgraduate training program.
8. As used in this subsection, "health care provider" means a
facility that will be employing the licensee within an academic
health system or the Oklahoma State University College of
Osteopathic Medicine.
D. Any foreign applicant or international medical school
graduate shall have a command of the English language that is
satisfactory to the State Board of Medical Licensure and
Supervision, demonstrated determined by the passage of an oral
English competency examination Educational Commission for Foreign
Medical Graduates (ECFMG).
D. E. The Board may promulgate rules requiring all foreign
applicants to satisfactorily complete at least twelve (12) months
and up to twenty-four (24) months of Board-approved progressive
graduate medical training as determined necessary by the Board for
the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2050 Page 3

E. F. All credentials, diplomas and other required
documentation in a foreign language submitted to the Board by such
applicants shall be accompanied by notarized English translations
performed by an institution accredited by the North Central
Association of Colleges and Schools.
F. G. Foreign applicants and international medical school
graduates shall provide satisfactory evidence of having met the
requirements for permanent residence or temporary nonimmigrant
status as set forth by the United States Immigration and
Naturalization Service.
G. Foreign applicants shall provide a certified copy H. The
Board requires original source verification of the Educational
Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG) Certificate to the
Board at such time and in such manner as required by the Board. The
Board may waive the requirement for an Educational Commission for
Foreign Medical Graduates Certificate by rule for good cause shown
Certification or Medical Council of Canada Qualifying Examination
(MCCQUE) Certification.
I. The applicant shall not have committed or been found guilty
by a competent authority, United States or foreign, of any conduct
that would constitute grounds for disciplinary action under this act
or rules by the Board. The Board may modify this restriction for
cause.
J. If the applicant has not been practicing medicine for more
than two (2) years, the applicant shall be subject to Section 495h
of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2050 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2050 Page 5